Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.230

Licensee—Business office—Records to be kept.

(1) Every licensee required to keep and maintain records pursuant to this section, other than an out-of-state collection agency, shall establish and maintain a regular active business office in the state of Washington for the purpose of conducting his, her, or its collection agency business. Said office must be open to the public during reasonable stated business hours, and must be managed by a resident of the state of Washington.

(2) Every licensee shall keep a record of all sums collected by him, her, or it and all disbursements made by him, her, or it. All such records shall be kept at the business office referred to in subsection (1) of this section, unless the licensee is an out-of-state collection agency, in which case the record shall be kept at the business office listed on the licensee's license.

(3) Licensees shall maintain and preserve accounting records of collections and payments to customers for a period of four years from the date of the last entry thereon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 518; 1994 c 195 s 6; 1987 c 85 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 20 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 14.]